Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.092

Gubernatorial appointees—Continuation of service—Appointments to fill vacancies.

(1) Any gubernatorial appointee subject to senate confirmation shall continue to serve unless rejected by a vote of the senate. An appointee who is rejected by a vote of the senate shall not be reappointed to the same position for a period of one year from termination of service.

(2) Any person appointed by the governor to fill the unexpired term of an appointment subject to senate confirmation must also be confirmed by the senate.

[ 1981 c 338 s 2.]